Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.29
Board of Regents; Department of Administrative Services; heat, light, power; furnish; agreement.

The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska is authorized to furnish and to enter into agreements with the Department of Administrative Services to furnish heat, light, and power for use at any building leased by the State of Nebraska. Any such agreement shall provide for the apportionment of costs in the same manner as is provided in section 81-1108.26.

Laws 1967, c. 468, § 7, p. 1461;

R.R.S.1943, § 72-710.03;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 20.